Hawaii statutes.
[§668A-8] Cotenant buyout. (a) If any
cotenant requested partition by sale, after the determination of value under
section 668A-7, the special master shall send notice to the parties that any
cotenant except a cotenant that requested partition by sale may buy the
interest of any cotenant that requested partition by sale.

(b) Not later than forty-five days after the
notice is sent under subsection (a), any cotenant except a cotenant that
requested partition by sale may give notice to the court that it elects to buy
all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale.

(c) The purchase price for each of the
interests of a cotenant that requested partition by sale is the value of the
entire parcel determined under section [668A-7] multiplied by that cotenant's
fractional ownership of the entire parcel.

(d) After expiration of the period in
subsection (b), the following rules shall apply:

(1) If only one cotenant elects to buy all the
interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the special master
shall notify all the parties of that fact;

(2) If more than one cotenant elects to buy all the
interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the court shall
allocate the right to buy those interests among the electing cotenants based on
each electing cotenant's existing fractional ownership of the entire parcel
divided by the total existing fractional ownership of all cotenants electing to
buy and the special master shall send notice to all the parties of that fact
and of the price to be paid by each electing cotenant; and

(3) If no cotenant elects to buy all the interests of
the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the special master shall send
notice to all the parties of that fact and resolve the action for partition
under section 668A‑9(a) and (b).

(e) If the special master sends notice to the
parties under subsection (d)(1) or (2), the court shall set a date, not earlier
than sixty days after the date the notice was sent, by which electing cotenants
must pay their apportioned price into the court. After the deadline for
payment set by the court, the following rules shall apply:

(1) If all electing cotenants timely pay their
apportioned price, the court shall issue an order reallocating all the interests
of the cotenants and disburse the amounts held by the court to the persons
entitled to them;

(2) If no electing cotenant timely pays its
apportioned price, the court shall resolve the action for partition under
section 668A-9(a) and (b), as if the interests of the cotenants that requested
partition by sale were not purchased; and

(3) If one or more but not all the electing cotenants
fail to timely pay their apportioned price, the court, on motion, shall direct
the special master to give notice to the electing cotenants that paid their
apportioned price of the interest remaining and the price for that interest.
Unless otherwise ordered by the court, for any notice that the special master
is required to give pursuant to this paragraph, the movant for notice to be
given to electing cotenants pursuant to this paragraph shall deliver to the
court a notice in blank to be completed by the special master with sufficient
copies for service on the electing cotenants along with envelopes stamped with
sufficient postage and addressed to each electing cotenant. The court may
direct the movant to provide notice of the value by any other means.

(f) No later than twenty days after the
special master gives the notice pursuant to subsection (e)(3), any cotenant
that paid may elect to purchase the remaining interest by paying the entire
price to the court. After the twenty-day period, the following rules shall
apply:

(1) If only one cotenant pays the entire price for
the remaining interest, the court shall issue an order reallocating the
remaining interest to that cotenant. The court shall promptly issue an order
reallocating all the interests of all the cotenants and disburse the amounts
held by the court to the persons entitled to them;

(2) If no cotenant pays the entire price for the
remaining interest, the court shall resolve the partition action under section
668A-9(a) and (b), as if the interests of the cotenants that requested
partition by sale were not purchased; and

(3) If more than one cotenant pays the entire price
for the remaining interest, the court shall reapportion the remaining interest
among those paying cotenants, based on each paying cotenant's original
fractional ownership of the entire parcel divided by the total original
fractional ownership of all cotenants that paid the entire price for the
remaining interest. The court shall promptly issue an order reallocating all
the cotenants' interests, disburse the amounts held by the court to the persons
entitled to them, and promptly refund any excess payment held by the court to
the appropriate cotenant.

(g) No later than forty-five days after the
special master sends notice to the parties pursuant to subsection (a), any
cotenant entitled to buy an interest under this section may request the court
to authorize the sale of the interests of cotenants named as defendants and
served with the complaint but that did not appear in the action as part of the
pending action.

(h) If the court receives a timely request
under subsection (g), the court, after hearing, may deny the request or
authorize the requested additional sale on such terms as the court determines
are fair and reasonable, subject to the following limitations:

(1) A sale authorized under this subsection may occur
only after the purchase prices for all interests subject to sale under
subsections (a) through (f) have been paid into the court and those interests
have been reallocated among the cotenants as provided in those subsections; and

(2) The purchase price for the interest of an absent
cotenant is based on the court's determination of value under section 668A-7.

(i) The cotenant requesting partition by sale
shall be liable for reasonable court fees. [L 2016, c 260, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next